test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VINIT_NoExtra_apanjigan_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giapanjiganinaanibanag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giapanjiganinaanibaning
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giapanjiganinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giapanjiganinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giapanjiganinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2apanjigan+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giapanjiganiwaaibanan
     +Px2apanjigan+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giapanjiganiwaaibanag
     +Px2apanjigan+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giapanjiganiwaaibaning
     +Px2apanjigan+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giapanjiganiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2apanjigan+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giapanjiganiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2apanjigan+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giapanjiganiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2apanjigan+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giapanjiganiniibanan
     +Px2apanjigan+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giapanjiganiniibanag
     +Px2apanjigan+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giapanjiganiniibaning
     +Px2apanjigan+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giapanjiganini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2apanjigan+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giapanjiganini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2apanjigan+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giapanjiganini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oapanjiganinaanibanan
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oapanjiganinaanibanag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oapanjiganinaanibaning
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oapanjiganinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oapanjiganinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oapanjiganinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3apanjigan+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oapanjiganiwaaibanan
     +Px3apanjigan+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oapanjiganiwaaibanag
     +Px3apanjigan+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oapanjiganiwaaibaning
     +Px3apanjigan+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oapanjiganiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3apanjigan+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oapanjiganiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3apanjigan+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oapanjiganiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3apanjigan+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oapanjiganiniibanan
     +Px3apanjigan+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oapanjiganiniibanag
     +Px3apanjigan+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oapanjiganiniibaning
     +Px3apanjigan+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oapanjiganini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3apanjigan+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oapanjiganini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3apanjigan+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oapanjiganini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: apanjiganensimishinaan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: apanjiganensimishiwaa
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: apanjiganensimishini
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: apanjiganenhimishinaan
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: apanjiganenhimishiwaa
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: apanjiganenhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: apanjiganensimishiban
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: apanjiganensimish***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: apanjiganenhimishiban
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: apanjiganenhimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 7
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: apanjiganensimishan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: apanjiganensimishag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: apanjiganensimishing
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: apanjiganenhimishan
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: apanjiganenhimishag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: apanjiganenhimishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: apanjiganensiminaaniban
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: apanjiganensiminaan***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: apanjiganensimiwaaiban
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: apanjiganensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: apanjiganensiminiiban
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: apanjiganensimini***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: apanjiganenhiminaaniban
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: apanjiganenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: apanjiganenhimiwaaiban
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: apanjiganenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: apanjiganenhiminiiban
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: apanjiganenhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: apanjiganensiminaanan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: apanjiganensiminaanag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: apanjiganensiminaaning
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: apanjiganensimiwaaan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: apanjiganensimiwaaag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: apanjiganensimiwaaing
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: apanjiganensiminian
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: apanjiganensiminiag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: apanjiganensiminiing
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: apanjiganenhiminaanan
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: apanjiganenhiminaanag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: apanjiganenhiminaaning
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: apanjiganenhimiwaaan
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: apanjiganenhimiwaaag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: apanjiganenhimiwaaing
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: apanjiganenhiminian
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: apanjiganenhiminiag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: apanjiganenhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: apanjiganensimibanan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: apanjiganensimibanag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: apanjiganensimibaning
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganensim***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganensim***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganensim***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: apanjiganenhimibanan
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: apanjiganenhimibanag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: apanjiganenhimibaning
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganenhim***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganenhim***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: apanjiganensishinaaniban
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: apanjiganensishinaan***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: apanjiganensishiwaaiban
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: apanjiganensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: apanjiganensishiniiban
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: apanjiganensishini***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: apanjiganenhishinaaniban
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: apanjiganenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: apanjiganenhishiwaaiban
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: apanjiganenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: apanjiganenhishiniiban
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: apanjiganenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: apanjiganensishinaanan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: apanjiganensishinaanag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: apanjiganensishinaaning
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: apanjiganensishiwaaan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: apanjiganensishiwaaag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: apanjiganensishiwaaing
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: apanjiganensishinian
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: apanjiganensishiniag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: apanjiganensishiniing
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: apanjiganenhishinaanan
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: apanjiganenhishinaanag
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: apanjiganenhishinaaning
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: apanjiganenhishiwaaan
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: apanjiganenhishiwaaag
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: apanjiganenhishiwaaing
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: apanjiganenhishinian
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: apanjiganenhishiniag
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: apanjiganenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: apanjiganensishibanan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: apanjiganensishibanag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: apanjiganensishibaning
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganensish***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganensish***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganensish***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: apanjiganenhishibanan
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: apanjiganenhishibanag
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: apanjiganenhishibaning
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganenhish***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganenhish***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: apanjiganensinaanibanan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: apanjiganensinaanibanag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: apanjiganensinaanibaning
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganensinaan***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: apanjiganensiwaaibanan
     apanjigan+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: apanjiganensiwaaibanag
     apanjigan+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: apanjiganensiwaaibaning
     apanjigan+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: apanjiganensiniibanan
     apanjigan+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: apanjiganensiniibanag
     apanjigan+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: apanjiganensiniibaning
     apanjigan+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganensini***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganensini***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganensini***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: apanjiganenhinaanibanan
     apanjigan+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: apanjiganenhinaanibanag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: apanjiganenhinaanibaning
     apanjigan+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: apanjiganenhiwaaibanan
     apanjigan+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: apanjiganenhiwaaibanag
     apanjigan+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: apanjiganenhiwaaibaning
     apanjigan+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: apanjiganenhiniibanan
     apanjigan+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: apanjiganenhiniibanag
     apanjigan+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: apanjiganenhiniibaning
     apanjigan+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganenhini***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganenhini***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     apanjigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: apanjiganimishinaaniban
     apanjigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: apanjiganimishinaan***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: apanjiganimishiwaaiban
     apanjigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: apanjiganimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: apanjiganimishiniiban
     apanjigan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: apanjiganimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     apanjigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: apanjiganimishinaanan
     apanjigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: apanjiganimishinaanag
     apanjigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: apanjiganimishinaaning
     apanjigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: apanjiganimishiwaaan
     apanjigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: apanjiganimishiwaaag
     apanjigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: apanjiganimishiwaaing
     apanjigan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: apanjiganimishinian
     apanjigan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: apanjiganimishiniag
